Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 2. Maximum Charges

§ 40-14-212.
Credit service charge for consumer credit sales other than revolving charge accounts.

With respect to a consumer credit sale, other than a sale pursuant to a revolving charge account, a seller may contract for and receive a credit service charge not exceeding that permitted by this section.

The credit service charge, calculated according to the actuarial method, may not exceed:

Where the amount financed does not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00), the equivalent of the greater of either of the following:

The total of: Thirty-six percent (36%) per year on that part of the unpaid balances of the amount financed which is one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or less and twenty-one percent (21%) per year on that part of the unpaid balances of the amount financed which is more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00); or

Twenty-one percent (21%) per year on that part of the unpaid balances of the amount financed.

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1.

Where the amount financed exceeds seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00), any credit service charge specified in the buyer’s sale agreement.

This section does not limit or restrict the manner of contracting for the credit service charge, whether by way of add-on, discount, or otherwise, so long as the rate of the credit service charge does not exceed that permitted by this section. If the sale is precomputed:

The credit service charge may be calculated on the assumption that all scheduled payments will be made when due; and

The effect of prepayment is governed by the provisions on rebate upon prepayment (W.S.

40-14-221

).

For the purposes of this section, the term of a sale agreement commences with the date the credit is granted or, if goods are delivered or services performed ten (10) days or more after that date, with the date of commencement of delivery or performance. Differences in the lengths of months are disregarded and a day may be counted as one-thirtieth of a month. Subject to classifications and differentiations the seller may reasonably establish, a part of a month in excess of fifteen (15) days may be treated as a full month if periods of fifteen (15) days or less are disregarded and that procedure is not consistently used to obtain a greater yield than would otherwise be permitted.

Subject to classifications and differentiations the seller may reasonably establish, he may make the same credit service charge on all amounts financed within a specified range. A credit service charge so made does not violate subsection (b) of this section if:

When applied to the median amount within each range, it does not exceed the maximum permitted by subsection (b) of this section; and

When applied to the lowest amount within each range, it does not produce a rate of credit service charge exceeding the rate calculated according to paragraph (a)(i) of this section by more than eight percent (8%) of the rate calculated according to paragraph (a)(i) of this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the seller may contract for and receive a minimum credit service charge of not more than thirty dollars ($30.00).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-201; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-201; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1; 1984, ch. 29, § 1; 1996, ch. 86, § 2; 2013 ch. 124, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00)” for “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)” in (b)(i) and (b)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

In subdivision (e)(ii), the references to “paragraph (a)(i)” should apparently be “paragraph (b)(i).”

§ 40-14-213.
Additional charges.

In addition to the credit service charge permitted by this part, a seller may contract for and receive the following additional charges in connection with a consumer credit sale:

Official fees and taxes;

Charges for insurance as described in subsection (b) of this section; and

Charges excluded from the credit service charge by the federal Consumer Credit Protection Act or by rule adopted by the administrator.

An additional charge may be made for insurance written in connection with the sale, other than insurance protecting the seller against the buyer’s default or other credit loss:

With respect to insurance against loss of or damage to property, or against liability, if the seller furnishes a clear and specific statement in writing to the buyer, setting forth the cost of the insurance if obtained from or through the seller, and stating that the buyer may choose the person through whom the insurance is to be obtained;

With respect to consumer credit insurance providing life, accident, or health coverage, if the insurance coverage is not a factor in the approval by the seller of the extension of credit and this fact is clearly disclosed in writing to the buyer, and if, in order to obtain the insurance in connection with the extension of credit, the buyer gives specific affirmative written indication of his desire to do so after written disclosure to him of the cost thereof;

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 124 § 3.

Reasonable closing costs (W.S. 40-14-140(a)(v)) are additional charges.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-202; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-202; Laws 1989, ch. 187, § 1; 1990, ch. 7, § 1; 2013 ch. 124, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 79, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to consumer credit insurance, see article 4 of this chapter.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (a)(iii). and repealed (b)(iii) which read: “(iii) With respect to mechanical breakdown insurance, if: (A) Before consummation of the sale the seller furnishes a clear and specific statement in writing to the buyer setting forth the cost of the insurance and a copy of the policy; (B) The insurance coverage is not a factor in the approval by the seller of the extension of credit and that fact is clearly disclosed in writing to the buyer; and (C) The buyer gives specific affirmative written indication of his desire to purchase the insurance.”

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(iii), added “Credit” to “Consumer Credit Protection Act.”

Laws 2014, ch. 79, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Applied

in

Vogel v. Onyx Acceptance Corp., 2011 WY 163, 267 P.3d 1057,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Dec. 19, 2011).

§ 40-14-214.
Delinquency charges.

With respect to a consumer credit sale, refinancing, or consolidation, the parties may contract for a delinquency charge on any installment not paid in full within ten (10) days after its scheduled due date in an amount not exceeding the greater of:

Five percent (5%) of the unpaid amount of the installment; or

Ten dollars ($10.00).

A delinquency charge under subsection (a) of this section may be collected only once on an installment however long it remains in default. No delinquency charge may be collected if the installment has been deferred and a deferral charge (W.S.

40-14-215

) has been paid or incurred until ten (10) days after the deferred due date. A delinquency charge may be collected at the time it accrues or at any time thereafter.

No delinquency charge may be collected on an installment which is paid in full within ten (10) days after its scheduled installment due date even though an earlier maturing installment or a delinquency charge on an earlier installment may not have been paid in full. For purposes of this subsection payments are applied first to current installments and then to delinquent installments.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-203; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-203; Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 2.

Applied

in

Vogel v. Onyx Acceptance Corp., 2011 WY 163, 267 P.3d 1057,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Dec. 19, 2011).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of provision imposing “late charge” or similar exaction for delay in making periodic payments on note, mortgage or installment sale contract, 63 ALR3d 50.

§ 40-14-215.
Deferral charges.

With respect to a consumer credit sale, refinancing, or consolidation, the parties before or after default may agree in writing to a deferral of all or part of one (1) or more unpaid installments, and the seller may make and collect a charge which the buyer expressly agrees to pay as consideration for the deferral. A deferral charge may be collected at the time it is assessed or at any time thereafter.

The seller, in addition to the deferral charge, may make appropriate additional charges (W.S.

40-14-213

), and the amount of these charges which is not paid in cash may be added to the amount deferred for the purpose of calculating the deferral charge.

Except in connection with a revolving charge account, the parties may agree in writing at the time of a consumer credit sale, refinancing, or consolidation that if an installment is not paid within ten (10) days after its due date, the seller may unilaterally grant a deferral and make charges as provided in this section. No deferral charge may be made for a period after the date that the seller elects to accelerate the maturity of the agreement.

A delinquency charge made by the seller on an installment may not be retained if a deferral charge is made pursuant to this section with respect to the period of delinquency.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-204; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-204; Laws 1996, ch. 86, § 2.

Applied

in

Vogel v. Onyx Acceptance Corp., 2011 WY 163, 267 P.3d 1057,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Dec. 19, 2011).

§ 40-14-216.
Credit service charge on refinancing.

With respect to a consumer credit sale, refinancing, or consolidation, the seller may by agreement with the buyer refinance the unpaid balance and may contract for and receive a credit service charge based on the amount financed resulting from the refinancing at a rate not exceeding that permitted by the provisions on credit service charge for consumer credit sales (W.S.

40-14-212

). For the purpose of determining the credit service charge permitted, the amount financed resulting from the refinancing comprises the following:

If the transaction was not precomputed, the total of the unpaid balance and accrued charges on the date of refinancing, or, if the transaction was precomputed, the amount which the buyer would have been required to pay upon prepayment pursuant to the provisions on rebate upon prepayment (W.S.

40-14-221

) on the date of refinancing except that for the purpose of computing this amount no minimum credit service charge (W.S.

40-14-212

(f)) shall be allowed; and

Appropriate additional charges (W.S.

40-14-213

), payment of which is deferred.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-205; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-205.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-14-217.
Credit service charge on consolidation.

If a buyer owes an unpaid balance to a seller with respect to a consumer credit sale, refinancing, or consolidation, and becomes obligated on another consumer credit sale, refinancing, or consolidation with the same seller, the parties may agree to a consolidation resulting in a single schedule of payments pursuant to either of the following subsections:

The parties may agree to refinance the unpaid balance with respect to the previous sale pursuant to the provisions on refinancing (W.S.

40-14-216

) and to consolidate the amount financed resulting from the refinancing by adding it to the amount financed with respect to the subsequent sale. The seller may contract for and receive a credit service charge based on the aggregate amount financed resulting from the consolidation at a rate not exceeding that permitted by the provisions on credit service charge for consumer credit sales (W.S.

40-14-212

);

The parties may agree to consolidate by adding together the unpaid balances with respect to the two (2) sales.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-206; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-206.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-14-218.
Credit service charge for revolving charge accounts.

With respect to a consumer credit sale made pursuant to a revolving charge account, the parties to the sale may contract for the payment by the buyer of a credit service charge not exceeding that permitted in this section.

A charge may be made in each billing cycle which is a percentage of an amount no greater than:

The average daily balance of the account;

The unpaid balance of the account on the same day of the billing cycle; or

The median amount within a specified range within which the average daily balance of the account or the unpaid balance of the account on the same day of the billing cycle is included. A charge may be made pursuant to this paragraph only if the seller, subject to classifications and differentiations he may reasonably establish, makes the same charge on all balances within the specified range and if the percentage when applied to the median amount within the range does not produce a charge exceeding the charge resulting from applying that percentage to the lowest amount within the range by more than eight percent (8%) of the charge on the median amount.

Except as provided in paragraph (ii) of this subsection:

If the billing cycle is monthly, the charge may not exceed one and three-fourths percent (1.75%) of the amount pursuant to subsection (b) of this section; or

If the billing cycle is not monthly, the maximum charge is that percentage which bears the same relation to the applicable monthly percentage as the number of days in the billing cycle bears to thirty (30). For the purposes of this section, a variation of not more than four (4) days from month to month is “the same day of the billing cycle”.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, if there is an unpaid balance on the date as of which the credit service charge is applied, the seller may contract for and receive a charge in accordance with this subsection. For accounts with a billing cycle of thirty (30) days or more, the seller may receive a charge not exceeding three dollars ($3.00). For accounts with a billing cycle of less than thirty (30) days, the seller may receive a charge not to exceed the pro rata part of three dollars ($3.00) that bears the same relation to three dollars ($3.00) as the number of days in the billing cycle bears to thirty (30).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-207; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-207; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote (d), which read, "Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, if there is an unpaid balance on the date as of which the credit service charge is applied, the seller may contract for and receive a charge not exceeding fifty cents ($.50) if the billing cycle is monthly or longer, or the pro rata part of fifty cents ($.50) which bears the same relation to fifty cents ($.50) as the number of days in the billing cycle bears to thirty (30) if the billing cycle is shorter than monthly."

§ 40-14-219.
Advances to perform covenants of buyer.

If the agreement with respect to a consumer credit sale, refinancing, or consolidation contains covenants by the buyer to perform certain duties pertaining to insuring or preserving collateral and the seller pursuant to the agreement pays for performance of the duties on behalf of the buyer, the seller may add the amounts paid to the debt. Within a reasonable time after advancing any sums, he shall state to the buyer in writing the amount of the sums advanced, any charges with respect to this amount, and any revised payment schedule and, if the duties of the buyer performed by the seller pertain to insurance, a brief description of the insurance paid for by the seller including the type and amount of coverages. No further information need be given.

A credit service charge may be made for sums advanced pursuant to subsection (a) of this section at a rate not exceeding the rate stated to the buyer pursuant to the laws relating to disclosure with respect to the sale, refinancing, or consolidation, except that with respect to a revolving charge account the amount of the advance may be added to the unpaid balance of the amount and the seller may make a credit service charge not exceeding that permitted by the provisions on credit service charge for revolving charge accounts (W.S.

40-14-218

).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-208; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-208.

§ 40-14-220.
Right to prepay.

Subject to the provisions on rebate upon prepayment (W.S.

40-14-221

), the buyer may prepay in full the unpaid balance of a consumer credit sale, refinancing, or consolidation at any time without penalty.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-209; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-209.

§ 40-14-221.
Rebate upon prepayment.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, upon prepayment in full of the unpaid balance of a precomputed consumer credit sale, refinancing or consolidation, the unearned credit service charge shall be refunded based upon the Rule of 78's if the transaction under its original terms did not exceed sixty-one (61) monthly installments and upon the actuarial method, if the transaction by its original terms exceeded sixty-one (61) monthly installments. An amount not less than the unearned portion of the credit service charge calculated according to this section shall be rebated to the debtor. With respect to irregular payment transactions, the administrator may prescribe by rule the refund formula. If the rebate otherwise required is less than one dollar ($1.00), no rebate need be made.

Upon prepayment in full of a consumer credit sale, refinancing, or consolidation, other than one (1) pursuant to a revolving charge account, if the credit service charge then earned is less than any permitted minimum credit service charge (W.S. 40-14-212(f)) contracted for, whether or not the sale, refinancing, or consolidation is precomputed, the seller may collect or retain the minimum charge, as if earned, not exceeding the credit service charge contracted for.

If a deferral (W.S.

40-14-215

) has been agreed to, the unearned portion of the credit service charge shall be computed without regard to the deferral. The amount of deferral charge earned at the date of prepayment shall also be calculated. If the deferral charge earned is less than the deferral charge paid, the difference shall be added to the unearned portion of the credit service charge. If any part of a deferral charge has been earned but has not been paid, that part shall be subtracted from the unearned portion of the credit service charge or shall be added to the unpaid balance.

This section does not preclude the collection or retention by the seller of delinquency charges (W.S.

40-14-214

).

If the maturity is accelerated for any reason and judgment is obtained, the buyer is entitled to the same rebate as if payment had been made on the date judgment is entered.

Upon prepayment in full of a consumer credit sale by the proceeds of consumer credit insurance (W.S.

40-14-403

), the buyer or his estate is entitled to the same rebate as though the buyer had prepaid the agreement on the date the proceeds of the insurance are paid to the seller, but no later than ten (10) business days after satisfactory proof of loss is furnished to the seller.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 2-210; W.S. 1957, § 40-2-210; Laws 1973, ch. 190, § 3; 1979, ch. 117, § 1.